apertium-sme-sma.sma.lexc
LEXICON s-s-ODDEVEN-1 !tjåenghkies:tjåenghkie Pred=substantiv, innesiv og illativ tjåenghkesne -tjåanghkan
     ATTR-S ;
     PRED-S ;
:s   ODDCOMP ;

LEXICON s-s-ODDEVENNOCOMP-1 !tjåenghkies:tjåenghkie Pred=substantiv, innesiv og illativ tjåenghkesne -tjåanghkan
     ATTR-S ;
     PRED-S ;
:s   ODDCOMP ;


LEXICON Ces-Ces-ODD-1 
:%^DISIMPe     ATTR-S ;
:%^DISIMPe     PRED-S ;
   ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMPe         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:%^DISIMPe            R ;
   ODDCOMP ;

LEXICON Ces-Ces-ODDNOCOMP-1
:%^DISIMPe     ATTR-S ;
:%^DISIMPe     PRED-S ;


LEXICON les-les-ODD-1 
:%^DISIMPe     ATTR-S ;
:%^DISIMPe     PRED-S ;
   ODDCOMP ;


LEXICON Cs-Cs-Ce-ODD-1
  :%^DISIMP   ATTR-S ;
  :%^DISIMP   PRED-S ;
     ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMPe         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:%^DISIMPe            R ;
     ODDCOMP ;

LEXICON Cs-Cs-ODD-1
  :%^DISIMP   ATTR-S ;
  :%^DISIMP   PRED-S ;
     ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMPe         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:%^DISIMPe            R ;
     ODDCOMP ;

LEXICON Cs-Cs-ODDNOCOMP-1
  :%^DISIMP   ATTR-S ;
  :%^DISIMP   PRED-S ;
     ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMPe         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:%^DISIMPe            R ;

LEXICON hts-hts-ODD-1
  :%^DISIMP   ATTR-S ;
  :%^DISIMP   PRED-S ;
  :s  ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMPs         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:%^DISIMPs            R ;
  :s  ODDCOMP ;

LEXICON n-n-ODD-1 ! attr=n, pred= n
 ATTR-N ;
 PRED-N ;
:k ODDCOMP ; 

LEXICON n-n-ODDNOCOMP-1 ! attr=n, pred= n
 ATTR-N ;
 PRED-N ;



! type 2

LEXICON Ce-Ces-ODD-2
:e     ATTR-0;
:e     PRED-S;
       ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMPe         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:%^DISIMPe            R ;
       ODDCOMP ;

LEXICON NULL-s-ODDEVEN-2 !attr=e, Pred=s, Comp=even jih ODD, Case= ODD
  :e ATTR-0 ;
  :e PRED-S ;
  :es  ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:es         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:es            R ;
:es  ODDCOMP ;
:e  EVENCOMP ;

LEXICON NULL-s-ODD-2 !attr=e, Pred=s, Comp=even jih ODD, Case= ODD
  :e ATTR-0 ;
  :e PRED-S ;
  :es  ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:es         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:es            R ;
  :es  ODDCOMP ;



! type 3
LEXICON Cs-Ce-ODD-3
       ATTR-S ;
  :e   PRED-0 ;
       ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMPe         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:%^DISIMPe            R ;
       ODDCOMP ;

LEXICON Cs-Ce-ODDNOCOMP-3
     ATTR-S ;
:e   PRED-0 ;



LEXICON Ces-Ce-ODD-3
:%^DISIMPe     ATTR-S;
:%^DISIMPe     PRED-0;
   ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMPe         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:%^DISIMPe            R ;
   ODDCOMP ;


LEXICON Ces-Ce-ODDNOCOMP-3
:%^DISIMPe     ATTR-S;
:%^DISIMPe     PRED-0;
   ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMPe         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:%^DISIMPe            R ;


LEXICON Ces-Ce-Ces-Ce-ODD-3  !as Ces-Ces-Ce-ODD, but with ATTR-0
:%^DISIMPe     ATTR-0 ;
       Ces-Ces-Ce-ODD-3 ;
       
       
LEXICON Ces-Ces-Ce-ODD-3
:%^DISIMPe     ATTR-S;
:%^DISIMPe     PRED-S;
   ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMPe         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:%^DISIMPe            R ;
   ODDCOMP ;



LEXICON Ces-Ces-Ce-ODDNOCOMP-3
:%^DISIMPe     ATTR-S;
:%^DISIMPe     PRED-S;
   ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMPe         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:%^DISIMPe            R ;

LEXICON hks-hke-hks-hke-ODD-3
:%^DISIMP     ATTR-S ;
:%^DISIMP     PRED-S;
   ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMPe         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:%^DISIMPe            R ;
   ODDCOMP ;


! type 4

LEXICON as-an-ODD-4
   ATTR-S ;
   PRED-N ;
:k  ODDCOMP ;

LEXICON oes-an-ODD-4
:oe   ATTR-S ;
:a    PRED-N ;
:oek  ODDCOMP ;

LEXICON oes-an-ODDNOCOMP-4
:oe   ATTR-S ;
:a    PRED-N ;
:oek  ODDCOMP ;

LEXICON h-n-ODD-4
 ATTR-H ;
 PRED-N ;
:k  ODDCOMP ; 

LEXICON h-n-NULL-ODD-4
 ATTR-H ;
 PRED-N ;
:k  ODDCOMP ; 


LEXICON oeh-an-ODD-4
:oe   ATTR-H ;
      PRED-AN ;
:ahk ODDCOMP ;
 :oehk ODDCOMP ; !XXX check this o

LEXICON oeh-oeh-an-ODD-4 ! Attr=oeh, Pred=oeh og an 
:oe ATTR-H ;
:oe PRED-H ;
    PRED-AN ; 
:ahk  ODDCOMP ;
:oehk ODDCOMP ; 


LEXICON NULL-n-ODD-4
 ATTR-0 ;
 PRED-N ;
:k  ODDCOMP ; 



LEXICON e-an-ODD-4
:e ATTR-0 ;
   PRED-AN ; 





! Some loanword lexica, awaiting a proper treatment
! they have a +LOAN tag to identify them.

!LEXICON LOANADJ
!+LOAN: NULL-s-ODDEVEN-2  ; ! the idea here is to get both -e and -es
!+LOAN: ATTR-0 ;

LEXICON ISKADJ
+LOAN: ATTR-0 ;
+LOAN:sk NULL-s-ODDEVEN-2 ; 
+LOAN:hk e-es-EVEN-2 ;

!LEXICON LOANSUB
!+LOAN: 
!


! Attribute lexica
! ----------------

LEXICON ATTR-0
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A+Attr: R ;
+A+Attr+Der2+Der/voete:%»voet GIERIEHTSADTJE ;

LEXICON ATTR-S
+A+Attr:%>s FINAL1 ;
+A+Attr:%>s R ;
+A+Attr+Der2+Der/voete:%>s%»voet GIERIEHTSADTJE ;

LEXICON ATTR-H
+A+Attr:%>h   FINAL1 ;
+A+Attr:%>h   R ;
+A+Attr+Der2+Der/voete:%>h%»voet GIERIEHTSADTJE ;

LEXICON ATTR-N
+A+Attr:%>n FINAL1 ;
+A+Attr:%>n R ;
+A+Attr+Der2+Der/voete:%>n%»voet GIERIEHTSADTJE ;

LEXICON ATTRCONT
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;


! Predicative lexica
! ------------------

LEXICON ODDCASE
+A+Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
+A+Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +A+Sg+Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
+A+Sg+Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
+A+Sg+Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
+A+Sg+Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
+A:    N_ODD_ESS ;
+A+SgGenCmp:e%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
+A+PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPi R ;

LEXICON eCASE
+A+Sg:           NIEJTE_SG  ;
+A+Pl:           NIEJTE_PL  ;
+A:              EVEN_ESS ;
+A+SgNomCmp:e    R ;
+A+SgGenCmp:e%>n R ;
+A+PlGenCmp:%>i  R ;


LEXICON aCASE
+A+Sg:           MAANA_SG  ;
+A+Pl:           MAANA_PL  ;
+A:              EVEN_ESS ;
+A+SgNomCmp:a    R ;
+A+SgGenCmp:a%>n R ;
+A+PlGenCmp:a%>j  R ;

LEXICON ieCASE
  +A+Sg: N_IE_SG ;
  +A+Pl: N_IE_PL ;
  +A:    N_IE_ESS ;
  +A+SgNomCmp:ie              R ;
  +A+SgGenCmp:ie%>n           R ;
  +A+PlGenCmp:ie%>j           R ;
  +A+PlGenCmp+Uml:%>%^iUMLi R ;

LEXICON oeCASE
 +A+Sg: A_OE_SGILL_UML ; ! Causes Umlaut
         A_OE ;

LEXICON A_OE_SGILL_UML
 +Ill+Uml:e%>%^2UMLse	FINAL1      ; ! Causes Umlaut

LEXICON A_OE
  +A+Sg: A_OE_SG  ;
  +A+Pl: A_OE_PL  ;
  +A: A_OE_ESS ;
  +A+SgNomCmp:oe    R ;
  +A+SgGenCmp:oe%>n R ;
  +A+PlGenCmp:oe%>j R ;

LEXICON A_OE_SG
  +Nom:oe          FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:oe%>m       FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:oe%>n       FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:o%>se       FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:o%>sne      FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:o%>ste      FINAL1 ;
  +Com:o%>jne      FINAL1 ;

LEXICON A_OE_PL
  +Nom:oe%>h       FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:o%>jde      FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:oe%>j       FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:o%>jde      FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:o%>jne      FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:o%>jste     FINAL1 ;
  +Com:oe%>jgujmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON A_OE_ESS
  +Ess:o%>jne         FINAL1 ;



 
 LEXICON PRED-0
 +A+Pred: FINAL1 ; ! Awaiting full adj analysis 


LEXICON PRED-S
 +A+Pred:%>s FINAL1 ; ! Awaiting full adj analysis 

LEXICON PRED-H
 +A+Pred:%>h FINAL1 ; ! Awaiting full adj analysis 


LEXICON PRED-N
 +A+Pred:%>n FINAL1 ; ! Awaiting full adj analysis 

LEXICON PRED-AN
 +A+Pred:%>an FINAL1 ; ! Awaiting full adj analysis 





! Comparative forms
! -----------------

LEXICON EVENCOMP
+A+Comp+Attr:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP ATTRCONT ;
+A+Comp+Pred:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp:     EVENCOMPCASE ;
+A+Superl+Attr:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP ATTRCONT ;
+A+Superl+Pred:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP FINAL1 ;
   MES ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Attr:%>b%»adtje ATTRCONT ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Attr:%>b%»odtje ATTRCONT ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pred:%>b%»adtje FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pred:%>b%»odtje FINAL1 ;
 DIMCOMPCASE ;

LEXICON EVENCOMP_oe
+A+Comp+Attr:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP ATTRCONT ;
+A+Comp+Pred:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp:     EVENCOMPCASE_oe ;
+A+Superl+Attr:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP ATTRCONT ;
+A+Superl+Pred:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP FINAL1 ;
   MES_oe ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Attr:%>b%»adtje ATTRCONT ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Attr:%>b%»odtje ATTRCONT ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pred:%>b%»adtje FINAL1 ;
+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pred:%>b%»odtje FINAL1 ;
 DIMCOMPCASE ;

LEXICON Adjective
buajtehks+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:buajtahk Ces-Ces-Ce-ODD-3 ; 
barras:barra as-an-ODD-4 ; ! UMLAUT PRED 
besteles+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:bestiel Ces-Ces-Ce-ODD-3 ; !!VOKALUTVIDELSE COMP:IE!
garre:garr NULL-s-ODDEVEN-2 ; !garrebe, garremes, garresåbpoe, garresommes ! e(2)-stamme system2
gïengeles:gïengiel Ces-Ces-Ce-ODD-3 ; !!VOKALUTVIDELSE COMP:IE
hijven ATTR-0 ; 
hijven PRED-0 ; 
jïlle:jillie EVENCOMP ; 
ov-luhpehts:ov-luhpieht hts-hts-ODD-1 ; !VOKALUTVID COMP
luvrege:luvreg Ces-Ce-Ces-Ce-ODD-3 ; 
miehtjies:miehtjies ATTR-0 ; !Pred:miehtjine 
njaalmeldh:njaalmeldh ATTR-0 ; 
ov-luhpehts+Use/Sub:ov-luhpieht hts-hts-ODD-1 ; !VOKALUTVID COMP !
rovnegs+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:rovneg Cs-Cs-ODD-1 ; !
tjuavkeds:tjuavkad Cs-Cs-Ce-ODD-1 ; !VOKALUTVIDELSE COMP:A tjuavkadåbpoe
åenehks+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:åenie EVENCOMP ; !
åenehks+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:åeniehk hks-hke-hks-hke-ODD-3 ; !!VOKALUTVIDELSE COMP:IE KB: åeniehkommes/åanahkommes? !
